New Jersey, session 222, S3645.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The evaluation, determination of eligibility for special education and related services pursuant to chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, and, if eligible, development and implementation of a twice exceptional students individualized education program shall not be denied due to the average academic performance of the student. b.    A school district shall provide information to parents and guardians to educate them on the available options for obtaining special education and related services for a twice exceptional student. c.     As used in this act, twice exceptional student means a student: (1)   who shows the potential for performing at an above average level of academic performance when compared to peers in the same grade level; and (2)   who has one or more disabilities as defined by federal or State eligibility criteria for special education and related services. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.